Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.155.045

Certificate of individual achievement. (Expires August 31, 2024.)

Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, and concluding with the graduating class of 2021, students served under this chapter, who are not appropriately served by the graduation pathway options established in *RCW 28A.655.250, even with accommodations, may earn a certificate of individual achievement. The certificate may be earned using multiple measures to demonstrate skills and abilities commensurate with their individualized education programs. The determination of whether the graduation pathway options established in *RCW 28A.655.250 or the multiple measures authorized in this section are appropriate shall be made by the student's individualized education program team. For the students who use the multiple measures authorized by this section, the certificate of individual achievement is required for graduation from a public high school. The multiple measures that may be used to demonstrate skills and abilities of students under this section must be in agreement with the appropriate educational opportunity provided for the student as required by this chapter. The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the state special education advisory council, shall develop the guidelines for determining which types of multiple measures to demonstrate skills and abilities under this section are appropriate to use and graduation pathways that might be added to those in *RCW 28A.655.250 to support achievement of all students served under this chapter.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny a student the right to participation in the graduation pathway options established in *RCW 28A.655.250.

This section expires August 31, 2024.

[ 2019 c 252 s 104; 2007 c 354 s 3; 2004 c 19 s 104.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.655.250 was recodified as RCW 28A.230.710 pursuant to 2024 c 66 s 14.

Intent—2019 c 252: See note following RCW 28A.230.710.

Findings—Intent—2007 c 354: See note following RCW 28A.655.070.

Part headings and captions not law—Effective date—2004 c 19: See notes following RCW 28A.230.090.